Washington statutes.
RCW 19.144.090

Criminal penalties—Dates of limitation—Venue—Civil penalties and damages—Correction of public record.

(1) Any person who knowingly violates RCW 19.144.080 or who knowingly aids or abets in the violation of RCW 19.144.080 is guilty of a class B felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(b). Mortgage fraud is a serious level III offense per chapter 9.94A RCW.

(2) No information may be returned more than (a) five years after the violation, or (b) three years after the actual discovery of the violation, whichever date of limitation is later.

(3) For purposes of venue under this chapter, any violation of RCW 19.144.080 and 31.04.297(3) , is considered to have been committed: (a) In the county in which the residential property for which a residential mortgage loan is being sought is located; (b) in any county in which any act was performed in furtherance of the violation; or (c) in any county in which a document containing a misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission of a material fact is filed with the county recorder or the official registrar of deeds.

(4) Any person who violates this chapter is subject to civil forfeiture statutes.

(5) Any person who violates RCW 19.144.080 or 31.04.297(3) is liable for civil damages of five thousand dollars or actual damages, whichever is greater, including costs to repair the victim's credit record and quiet title on the residential property that is involved in the prosecution, and reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by the court.

(6) In a proceeding under RCW 19.144.080 in which there has been a conviction, the sentencing court may issue such orders as necessary to correct a public record that contains false information resulting from a violation of the referenced sections.

[ 2015 c 229 s 4; 2008 c 108 s 10.]